Montana, session 2025, HB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-104. Times for holding general elections. (1) A general election must be held throughout the
state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(2) In every even-numbered year, the following elections must be held on general election day:
(a) an election on any ballot issue submitted to electors pursuant to Article III, section 6, unless the
legislature orders a special election, or Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution;
(b) an election of federal officers, members of the legislature, state officers, multicounty district
officers elected at a statewide election, district court judges, and county officers; and
(c) an election of officers for municipalities required by law to hold the election; and
(c)(d) any other election required by law to be held on general election day in an even-numbered
year.
(3) In every odd-numbered year, the following elections must be held on the same day as the
general election:
(a) an election of officers for municipalities required by law to hold the election; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 221

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0221.2
(b) any other Only an election required by law to be held on general election day in an odd-
numbered year may be held in an odd-numbered year."

SECTION 2. SECTION 13-1-107, MCA, IS AMENDED TO READ:
"13-1-107. Times Time for holding primary elections -- cost of municipal election. (1) On the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding a general election held in an even-numbered year, a primary
election must be held throughout the state.
(2) On the Tuesday following the second Monday in September preceding a general election held
in an odd-numbered year, a primary election, if required, must be held throughout the state.
(3)(2) The cost of a municipal election must be paid by the municipality."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Transition. (1) For a municipal officer whose term of office ends in
January 2026, there must be an election in 2025 for a one-year term of office.
(2) For a municipal officer whose term of office ends in January 2028 or January 2030, there must
be a special election for a one-year term proceeding when their term of office is set to end. This special election
must take place during the preceding even-numbered year general election.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Applicability. [This act] applies to all municipal elections scheduled on
or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 221